Maine, session 132, LD1036.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§9-A-1 is enacted to read:
9-A-1. Status as recipient of federal, state or local public assistance. For purposes
of subchapter 4, "status as a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance" means an
individual's status as having federal, state or local public assistance as a source of income,
including medical assistance and housing subsidies, and includes the individual's having to
meet any requirements for the individual to use the income.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4581-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §§8 to 10 and c. 476,
§3, is further amended to read:
§4581-A. Unlawful housing discrimination
It is unlawful housing discrimination, in violation of this Act:
1. Sale or rental of housing and other prohibited practices. For any owner, lessee,
sublessee, managing agent or other person having the right to sell or rent or manage a
housing accommodation, or any agent of these, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin, familial status, status as a recipient of federal, state or local
public assistance or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 of any prospective
purchaser, occupant or tenant of the housing accommodation;
B. Refuse to show or refuse to sell, rent, lease, let or otherwise deny to or withhold
from any person the housing accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national
origin or, familial status or status as a recipient of federal, state or local public
assistance or because the person sought and received an order of protection under Title
19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110;
C. Make, print or publish or cause to be made, printed or published any notice,
statement or advertisement relating to the sale, rental or lease of the housing
accommodation that indicates any preference, limitation or discrimination based upon
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, status as a recipient of federal, state
or local public assistance or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 or an
intention to make any such preference, limitation or discrimination;
D. Discriminate against any person because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or,
familial status or status as a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance or
because the person sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former
section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 in the price, terms, conditions or privileges of
the sale, rental or lease of any housing accommodations or in the furnishing of facilities
or services in connection with any housing accommodations; or
E. Evict or attempt to evict any tenant of any housing accommodation because of the
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
Page 1 - 132LR2111(01)

414 religion, ancestry, national origin or, familial status or status as a recipient of federal,
425 state or local public assistance of the tenant or because the tenant sought and received
436 an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section
447 4110;
2. Selling, brokering or appraising of housing. For any real estate broker or real
estate salesperson, or any agent of these, to:
A. Fail or refuse to show any person a housing accommodation listed for sale, lease or
rent because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or, familial status or status as a
recipient of federal, state or local public assistance or because the person sought and
received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A,
section 4110;
B. Misrepresent, for the purpose of discriminating because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national
origin, familial status, status as a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance or
any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110, the availability or asking price of a
housing accommodation listed for sale, lease or rent or for such reason to fail to
communicate to the person having the right to sell, rent or lease the housing
accommodation any offer for the same made by any applicant;
C. In any other manner to discriminate against any applicant for a housing
accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity,
physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or, familial status or
status as a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance or because the applicant
sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or
Title 19-A, section 4110;
D. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record concerning the race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, status as a recipient of federal, state
or local public assistance or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 of any
applicant for or intended occupant of a housing accommodation; or
E. Accept for listing any housing accommodation when the person having the right to
sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation has directly or indirectly indicated an
intention of discriminating among prospective tenants or purchasers on the ground of
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, status as a recipient of federal, state
or local public assistance or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110, or when
the broker or salesperson knows or has reason to know that the person having the right
to sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation has made a practice of discrimination
since July 1, 1972; or
3. Making of loans; other financial assistance. For any person to whom application
is made for a loan or other form of financial assistance for the acquisition, construction,
Page 2 - 132LR2111(01)

415 rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation, whether secured or
426 unsecured, or agent of the person, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any oral or written inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin, familial status, status as a recipient of federal, state or local
public assistance or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 of any applicant for
financial assistance or of existing or prospective occupants or tenants of housing
accommodations; or
B. Discriminate in the granting of financial assistance, or in the terms, conditions or
privileges relating to obtaining or the use of any financial assistance, against any
applicant because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, status as a
recipient of federal, state or local public assistance or any previous actions seeking and
receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007; or Title 19-A,
section 4110.
4. Receipt of public assistance. For any person furnishing rental premises or public
accommodations to refuse to rent or impose different terms of tenancy to any individual
who is a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance, including medical assistance
and housing subsidies, primarily because of the individual's status as recipient.